Tennessee, session 114, HB0530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-9-226(a), is amended by deleting
subdivisions (1) and (2) and substituting the following:
(1) Has successfully completed a National Association of State Boating Law
Administrators (NASBLA) approved boating safety examination that is approved by the
agency; and
(2) Has received a certificate from the agency as evidence of successful
completion of an NASBLA approved boating safety examination that is approved by the
agency; or
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-9-226(c), is amended by deleting
subdivision (4) and substituting the following:
(4) Shall be issued for a fee set by the commission. The commission may also
set a separate fee for the issuance of a replacement card.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-9-226(d)(4)(A), is amended by
deleting the word "monitored".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0530
002467
- 1 -